Wyoming statutes. Title 17 Corporations, Partnerships and Associations
Chapter 19 Wyoming Nonprofit Corporation Act

Source. —

This chapter is based upon the revised Model Nonprofit Corporation Act.

Cross references. —

As to immunity from liability for volunteer health care professionals, see §

1-1-129

.

As to applicability of this chapter to Wyoming Cooperative Utilities Act (chapter 20 of this title), see §

17-20-103

.

Legislative findings. —

Laws 1992, ch. 53, § 4, provides: “The legislature finds that this act is modeled from the Revised Model Nonprofit Corporation Act that was adopted by the Committee on Corporate Laws of the American Bar Association in 1987 and that the comments to the model act should be used interpreting this act.”

Editor's notes. —

All of the following annotations were taken from cases decided under former chapter 7 of this title.

Testator presumed to know statutes. —

Testator making will contemplating organization of corporation to handle trust property must be held to have had knowledge of statutes relating to such corporations. Bentley v. Whitney Benefits, 41 Wyo. 11, 281 P. 188,

1929 Wyo. LEXIS 1

(Wyo. 1929).

No authority to dispose of real property in charitable trust. —

While authority is given in this section to dispose of personal property, none appears to have been given to dispose of real property held in a charitable trust. Cody v. Buffalo Bill Memorial Ass'n, 64 Wyo. 468, 196 P.2d 369,

1948 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1948).

Unless power given by trust instrument. —

Corporation organized to administer provisions for educational purposes as contemplated by will, with power to deal with realty as testator would, had power to sell real estate. Bentley v. Whitney Benefits, 41 Wyo. 11, 281 P. 188,

1929 Wyo. LEXIS 1

(Wyo. 1929).

Unrestricted grants may be used as deemed best. —

If grants made to a charitable corporation are absolute and no purpose is expressed for which they are made, the property may be used in such manner as those in control deem best for the accomplishment of the corporate purposes, and these purposes are determined by the charter and the statutes relating thereto. Cody v. Buffalo Bill Memorial Ass'n, 64 Wyo. 468, 196 P.2d 369,

1948 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1948).

And there is presumption that grants were intended for charitable uses.

An implied trust, enforceable in the courts, arises that they shall be so used. Cody v. Buffalo Bill Memorial Ass'n, 64 Wyo. 468, 196 P.2d 369,

1948 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1948).

Transfers of real estate held void. —

Where a charitable corporation transferred real property held by it in a charitable trust and subject to certain conditions, in order to relieve itself of financial difficulty, the transfers were held to be void and reconveyance was ordered, since the transfers could only have been made with the consent and approval of a court of equity in the absence of any authority in this section to dispose of real property held on a charitable trust. Cody v. Buffalo Bill Memorial Ass'n, 64 Wyo. 468, 196 P.2d 369,

1948 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1948).

Section recognizes establishment of historical society as charitable use. —

This section recognizes that to establish and maintain a historical society for the preservation of the history and antiquities of the county is a charitable use. Cody v. Buffalo Bill Memorial Ass'n, 64 Wyo. 468, 196 P.2d 369,

1948 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1948).

Gift of memorial monument deemed for charitable purpose. —

A gift for the erection of a monument dedicated to the education and elevation of the public, or as a memorial to a prominent citizen, is for a charitable purpose. Cody v. Buffalo Bill Memorial Ass'n, 64 Wyo. 468, 196 P.2d 369,

1948 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1948).

Hospital held charitable institution. —

A hospital organized under this chapter, with capital stock and paying no dividends and maintained with funds donated from missionary appropriations, caring for all sick and injured, but charging those who are able to pay, is a charitable institution. Bishop Randall Hosp. v. Hartley, 24 Wyo. 408, 160 P. 385,

1916 Wyo. LEXIS 41

(Wyo. 1916).

Law reviews. —

For article, “The New Wyoming Business Corporation Act and Close Corporation Supplement,” see XXV Land & Water L. Rev. 527 (1990).

For comment, “Personal Liability for Directors of Nonprofit Corporations in Wyoming,” see XVIII Land & Water L. Rev. 273 (1983).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

15 Am. Jur. 2d Charities §§ 171 to 207; 66 Am. Jur. 2d Religious Societies § 1 et seq.

Living quarters or recreational property as within tax exemption of religious, educational, charitable or hospital organizations, 15 ALR2d 1064, 55 ALR3d 356, 55 ALR3d 485.

Dining rooms or restaurants as within property tax exemption of religious, educational, charitable or hospital organizations, 72 ALR2d 521.

Property tax exemption where legal title is held in trust for charitable, educational or religious organization, 94 ALR2d 626.

Garage or parking lot as within property tax exemption of educational, charitable or hospital organizations, 33 ALR3d 938.

Right of charitable or religious association or corporation to protection against use of same or similar name by another, 37 ALR3d 277.

Effect of payments from beneficiaries on tax-exempt status as charitable institution, 37 ALR3d 1191.

Availability of tax exemption to property leased from exempt owner, 54 ALR3d 402.

Exemption of property leased by and used for purposes of tax-exempt organization, 55 ALR3d 430.

Liability of charitable organization under respondeat superior doctrine for tort of unpaid volunteer, 82 ALR3d 1213.

Standing of minister or member of religious society to seek enforcement, termination or proper administration of charitable trust, 94 ALR3d 1204.

Disposition of surplus trust income after payment of specific sum to charity, 96 ALR3d 954.

Right to assets of voluntarily dissolved lodge or club, 70 ALR4th 897.

14 C.J.S. Charities §§ 60 to 68; 76 C.J.S. Religious Societies § 1 et seq.